Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-504.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-504.01. Guardians and agents; rights in proceedings Guardians and agents who have decisional authority to make personal, medical and treatment decisions for a patient pursuant to an order of the court or pursuant to a validly executed mental health power of attorney in which the principal has been found incapable of giving informed consent have the following rights in any proceedings under this article regarding involuntary treatment of the patient: 1. To be notified of any petition for treatment, motion for amended court order, application for continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment, application for conversion to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment and request for judicial review. 2. If allowed by the court, to provide the court with the guardian's or agent's position regarding the relief being sought in any of the proceedings set forth in paragraph 1 of this section and to provide the court with any relevant information to help the court make a determination. 3. To provide relevant information to any agency providing inpatient or outpatient screening, evaluation or treatment to the patient. 4. When appropriate, to participate in treatment and discharge planning with the inpatient or outpatient treatment providers. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 36-542, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-542. Discharge of patient at expiration of period ordered by court; change to voluntary status; immunity A. A patient who is ordered by a court to undergo treatment pursuant to this article shall be discharged from treatment at the expiration of the period of treatment ordered unless one of the following occurs: 1. The person accepts voluntary treatment at the mental health treatment agency. 2. Before the discharge date, a new petition is filed in the county in which the patient is being treated. The proceedings shall then be governed by this article. The costs of the proceedings shall be a charge against the county in which the patient resided or was found prior to hospitalization. 3. An application for continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment is granted pursuant to section 36-543. 4. An application for conversion to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment is granted pursuant to section 36-543.01. B. If a patient to be discharged is under guardianship, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall notify the guardian ten days before discharge. C. If a patient to be discharged is undergoing court-ordered treatment as a result of a petition filed by a prosecutor pursuant to section 13-4517 and the patient is being discharged because the medical director of the mental health treatment agency has decided not to file a new petition for court-ordered evaluation or treatment or has decided not to request the court to order that the previous order for treatment be continued renewed, the patient may not be discharged or released from treatment before compliance with section 36-541.01. D. The medical director of the mental health treatment agency is not civilly liable for any acts committed by a released or discharged patient if the medical director of the mental health treatment agency has in good faith followed the requirements of this article. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 36-543, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-543. Annual review; patients with a grave disability or a persistent or acute disability; notice; renewal of court order for treatment; rules; immunity A. Within ninety days before the expiration of a court order for treatment, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall conduct an annual review of a patient who has been found to have a grave disability or a persistent or acute disability and who is undergoing court-ordered treatment to determine whether the continuation of court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment is appropriate and to assess the needs of the patient for guardianship or conservatorship, or both. The annual review shall consist of the mental health treatment and clinical records contained in the patient's treatment file. The mental health treatment agency shall keep a record of the annual review. If the medical director of the mental health treatment agency believes that a continuation of court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment is appropriate, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall appoint one or more psychiatrists to carry out a psychiatric examination of the patient. In any proceeding conducted pursuant to this section, a patient has the right to have an analysis of the patient's mental condition by an independent evaluation pursuant to section 36-538. B. Each examiner participating in the psychiatric examination of the patient shall submit a report to the medical director of the mental health treatment agency that includes the following: 1. The examiner's opinions as to whether the patient continues to have a grave disability or a persistent or acute disability as the result of a mental disorder and be in need of continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment. In evaluating the patient's need for continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment, the examiner must consider, along with all other evidence, the patient's history before and during the current period of court-ordered treatment, the patient's compliance with recommended treatment and any other evidence relevant to the patient's ability and willingness to follow recommended treatment with or without a court order. 2. A statement as to whether suitable alternatives to court-ordered treatment are available. 3. A statement as to whether voluntary treatment would be appropriate. 4. A review of the patient's status as to guardianship or conservatorship, or both, the adequacy of existing protections of the patient and the continued need for guardianship or conservatorship, or both. If the examiner concludes that the patient's needs in these areas are not being adequately met, the examiner's report shall recommend that the court order an investigation into the patient's needs. 5. If the patient has an existing guardian who does not have the mental health powers authorized pursuant to section 14-5312.01, a recommendation as to whether the additional mental health powers authorized by section 14-5312.01 should be imposed on the existing guardian and whether the patient's needs can be adequately addressed by a guardian with mental health powers without the need for a court order for treatment or whether the court order for treatment should continue regardless of the additional mental health powers imposed on the guardian. 6. The results of any physical examination conducted during the period of court-ordered treatment if relevant to the psychiatric condition of the patient. C. After conducting the annual review as prescribed in this section, if the medical director of the mental health treatment agency believes that continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment is necessary or appropriate, not later than thirty days before the expiration of the court order for treatment, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall file with the court an application for continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment alleging the basis for the application and shall file simultaneously with the application any psychiatric examination conducted as part of the annual review. If the patient is under guardianship, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall mail a copy of the application to the patient's guardian. D. If an application for continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment is filed, all of the following apply: 1. If the patient does not have an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the patient. 2. Within ten days after appointment, an attorney appointed pursuant to this subsection, to the extent possible, shall fulfill the duties imposed pursuant to section 36-537, review the medical director's report of the medical director of the mental health treatment agency and the patient's medical records, interview any physician who prepared a report on the annual review and file a response requesting a hearing or submitting the matter to the court for a ruling based on the record without a hearing. 3. If a hearing is not requested, the court shall rule on the application or set the matter for hearing. If a hearing is requested, the hearing shall be held within three weeks after the request for hearing is filed.  The hearing may be continued for good cause on motion of a party or on the court's own motion, and the expiration of the current court order for treatment may be extended until a ruling by the court on an application filed pursuant to this subsection. 4. The patient's attorney must be present at all hearings and may subpoena and cross-examine witnesses and present evidence. The patient has the right to attend all hearings, but may choose not to attend a hearing. The patient's attorney may waive the patient's presence after speaking with the patient and confirming that the patient understands the right to be present and does not desire to attend. If the patient is unable to be present at the hearing for medical or psychiatric reasons and the hearing cannot be conducted where the patient is being treated or confined, or the patient cannot appear by another reasonably feasible means, the court shall require clear and convincing evidence that the patient is unable to be present at the hearing and on such a finding may proceed with the hearing in the patient's absence. 5. The evidence presented by the applicant includes the testimony of one or more witnesses acquainted with the patient during the period of court-ordered treatment, which may be satisfied by a statement agreed on by the parties, and the testimony of any physician who performed an annual review of the patient, which may be satisfied by stipulating to the admission of the examining physicians' written report prepared pursuant to subsection B of this section. The court may waive the need for the applicant to present the testimony of witnesses acquainted with the patient as required by this subsection, if it finds that the need for a continued renewal of the court order for treatment has been established by clear and convincing evidence from the other testimony and evidence presented at the hearing. 6. At a hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the court, with notice, may impose on an existing guardian additional powers pursuant to section 14-5312.01. If the court finds that the patient's needs can be adequately met by an existing guardian with the additional powers pursuant to section 14-5312.01 and that a court order for treatment is not necessary to ensure compliance with necessary treatment, the court may terminate the court order for treatment or decline to issue an order continuing court-ordered for renewal of the court order for treatment. The court may also order an investigation into the need for guardianship or conservatorship, or both, and may appoint a suitable person or agency to conduct the investigation. The appointee may include a court-appointed guardian ad litem, a court-appointed investigator pursuant to section 14-5308 or the public fiduciary if there is no person willing and qualified to act in that capacity. The court shall give notice of the appointment to the appointee within three days after the appointment. The appointee shall submit the report of the investigation to the court within twenty-one days. The report shall include recommendations as to who should be guardian or conservator, or both, and the findings and reasons for the recommendation. If the investigation and report so indicate, the court may authorize an appropriate person to file a petition for appointment of a guardian or conservator for the patient. E. If a hearing is held pursuant to subsection D of this section, the party seeking the renewal of the court order for treatment must prove all of the following by clear and convincing evidence: 1. The patient continues to have a mental disorder and, as a result of that disorder, has either a persistent or acute disability or a grave disability. 2. The patient is in need of continued court-ordered renewal of the court order for treatment. 3. The patient is either unwilling or unable to accept treatment voluntarily. F. After a hearing held pursuant to subsection D of this section, the court may order the patient to be released from court-ordered treatment or to undergo continued court-ordered renew the court order for treatment for a period not to exceed the time periods prescribed in section 36-540, subsection D. G. The director shall create and operate a program to ensure that the examination and review of persons with grave disabilities or persistent or acute disabilities under court order are carried out in an effective and timely manner. The director shall adopt rules needed to operate this program. H. The medical director of the mental health treatment agency is not civilly liable for any acts committed by the released patient if the medical director of the mental health treatment agency has in good faith complied with the requirements of this article. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 36, chapter 5, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-543.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-543.01. Continuing court-ordered treatment; annual review; order for conversion; annual report; burden of proof A. After conducting a patient's second consecutive annual review as prescribed in section 36-543, subsection A, if the medical director of the mental health treatment agency believes that an order for continuing court-ordered treatment is appropriate, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall appoint one or more psychiatrists to carry out a psychiatric examination of the patient and submit a report as set forth in section 36-543 and shall request the examiner to provide an opinion about the issues set forth in subsection C of this section in addition to the reporting requirements prescribed in section 36-543, subsection B. B. After receiving the report pursuant to subsection A of this section, if the medical director of the mental health treatment agency believes that an order for continuing court-ordered treatment is appropriate, at least thirty days before the expiration of the court order for treatment, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall file with the court an application for a conversion to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment alleging the basis for the application and shall file simultaneously with the application the report from the psychiatric examination performed pursuant to subsection A of this section.  if the patient does not have an attorney, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the patient.  A copy of the application shall be provided to the patient and the patient's attorney and, If the patient is under guardianship, to the patient's guardian. C. A court order for treatment may be converted to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment as set forth in this section if the court finds all the following by clear and convincing evidence: 1. The patient continues to have a mental disorder and, as a result of that disorder, has either a persistent or acute disability or a grave disability. 2. The patient is either unwilling or unable to accept treatment voluntarily. 3. Without an order for continuing court-ordered treatment the patient's condition is not likely to significantly improve and there is a substantial probability that the patient will suffer severe and abnormal mental, emotional or physical harm or be unable to provide for the patient's own basic physical needs. D. If the application for conversion to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment is denied, the court may order the patient to be released from court-ordered treatment or, if the provisions of section 36-543, subsection E have been met, order that the court order for treatment be renewed for a period of not more than the time periods prescribed in section 36-540, subsection D. E. If the application for conversion to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment is granted, the court shall order the patient to continue in treatment until the order for continuing court-ordered treatment is terminated by the court.  The maximum periods for inpatient treatment that a court may order pursuant to section 36-540, subsection F do not apply to an order for continuing court-ordered treatment issued pursuant to this section. F. Within ninety days before the anniversary date of the order for continuing court-ordered treatment, the medical director of the mental health treatment agency shall conduct an annual review of the patient and shall file a written annual report with the court.  The annual report shall contain a summary of the treatment provided to the patient since the last annual review and the patient's compliance with the treatment provided or recommended and shall state the opinion of the medical director whether the order for continuing court-ordered treatment should remain in effect or whether court-ordered treatment should be terminated.  A copy of the annual report shall be provided to the patient and the patient's attorney and, if the patient is under guardianship, to the patient's guardian.  On filing the annual report, the following apply: 1. If the annual report states that it is the opinion of the medical director of the mental health treatment agency that the patient's court-ordered treatment should be terminated, the annual report shall state the basis for that opinion, shall affirm that in reaching that opinion the medical director of the mental health treatment agency considered the patient's entire history of engagement in and compliance with treatment ordered or recommended and shall confirm that it is the opinion of the medical director of the mental health treatment agency that the patient is both willing and able to engage in and follow any recommended treatment voluntarily.  A copy of the annual report shall be provided to the patient and the patient's attorney and, if the patient is under guardianship, to the patient's guardian.  The guardian for the patient has the right to request a hearing to determine whether the standard for release has been met and to request that an independent evaluation of the patient be performed. 2. If the annual report states that it is the opinion of the medical director of the mental health treatment agency that the patient's court-ordered treatment should remain in effect, the annual report shall include a report of a psychiatrist who conducted an examination of the patient within ninety days before the anniversary date of the order for continuing court-ordered treatment that contains the following: (a) Confirmation that the psychiatrist reviewed the treatment records of the patient, including the services provided to the patient over the period since the last annual report. (b) A summary of the psychiatrist's observations of the patient's physical and mental condition. (c) The opinion of the psychiatrist as to whether an order for continuing court-ordered treatment should remain in place and the basis for that opinion. 3. If the annual report supports the continuation of the court order for treatment, the court, without a hearing, may order that the order for continuing court-ordered treatment remain in place. The patient may object to the order for continuing court-ordered treatment by filing a request for hearing within ten business days after the annual report is filed. The court shall hold this hearing within thirty calendar days after receipt of the request. Treatment pursuant to the existing court order shall continue pending the court's ruling on the issue. The patient has the right to request an independent evaluation.  At the hearing, the mental health treatment agency has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that an order for continuing court-ordered treatment pursuant to this section is necessary.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2026.